Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7836.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-10-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-10 entitled "Barbers,
Hairdressers, Cosmeticians, Manicurists and Estheticians" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-10-10. Application form — Fee — Expiration and renewal of licenses — Fees.
(a) Applications for licenses under § 5-10-9 shall be made upon any forms that are
prescribed by the division and are accompanied by an application fee established in regulation. The
license of every person licensed under §§ 5-10-8 and 5-10-9 shall expire on the thirtieth (30th) day
of October of every other year following the date of license. This is determined on an odd-even
basis. On or before the first day of September of every year, the administrator of professional
regulation shall mail an application for send notification of the renewal of license to persons those
scheduled to be licensed that year on an odd or even basis as to the license number. Every person
who wishes to renew his or her license must file with the administrator of professional regulation
a renewal application duly executed together with the renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54.
Applications, accompanied by the fee for renewal, shall be filed with the division on or before the
fifteenth (15th) day of October in each renewal year. Upon receipt of the application and fee, the
administrator of professional regulation shall grant a renewal license effective October 1 and
expiring two (2) years later on September 30.
(b) Every person who fails to renew his or her their license on or before September 30
following the date of issuance as provided in subsection (a) of this section may be reinstated by the

division upon payment of the current renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(c) The license shall be on the person at all times while performing the services for which
they are licensed.
SECTION 2. Section 5-25-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-25 entitled "Veterinary
Practice" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-25-12. Expiration and renewal of licenses.
(a) The certificate of every person licensed as a veterinarian under the provisions of this
chapter expires on the first day of May of each even-numbered year. On or before the first day of
March of each two-year (2) period, the department shall mail an application send a reminder for
renewal of license to every person to whom a license has been issued or renewed during the current
licensure period. Every person so licensed who desires to renew his or her their license shall file
with the department a renewal application duly executed together with a renewal fee as set forth in
§ 23-1-54 on or before the thirty-first first day of March May of each even-numbered year.
(b) Upon receipt of an application, and payment of the renewal fee, the department shall
grant a renewal license effective the second day of May, and expiring on the first day of May of
the next even-numbered year.
(c) Any person who allows his or her their license to lapse by failing to renew it on or
before the thirty-first first day of March May of the next even-numbered year, as provided in
subsection (a), may be reinstated by the department on payment of the current renewal fee plus an
additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(d) Any person using the title “veterinarian” during the time that his or her their license has
lapsed is subject to the penalties provided for violations of this chapter.
(e) Every veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine within the state shall, in
connection with renewal of licensure, provide satisfactory evidence to the department that in the
preceding two-year period the veterinarian has completed a prescribed course of continuing
professional education established by an appropriate professional veterinary medicine association
and approved by rule or regulation of the department. The department may extend for only one six-
month (6) period, these education requirements if the department is satisfied that the applicant has
suffered hardship which prevented meeting the educational requirement.
SECTION 3. Section 5-30-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-30 entitled "Chiropractic
Physicians" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-30-12. Annual registration — Payment of fees.
Annually, during the month of October in each year, every person granted a certificate to
practice chiropractic medicine shall register his or her their name, address, and place of business
LC005256 - Page 2 of 13

with the division of professional regulation of the department of health. The division shall keep a
book for that purpose record, and each person registering shall pay a fee as set forth in § 23-1-54
and shall receive a certificate of registration for the next succeeding fiscal year, unless the certificate
of practice has been suspended or revoked for cause, as provided in § 5-30-13. All fees for
examination, for certificate of exemption from examination, and for annual registration shall be
deposited as general revenues.
SECTION 4. Sections 5-31.1-7 and 5-31.1-21 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-31.1
entitled "Dentists and Dental Hygienists" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-31.1-7. Recertification — Continuing dental education.
(a) Effective beginning in the calendar year 2006, every Every dentist, dental hygienist, or
DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assistant licensed to practice within this state, on or
before the first day of May thirtieth of June in each even numbered year, shall apply to the Rhode
Island board of examiners in dentistry for a biennial license with the board. The applicant shall
include satisfactory evidence to the board of examiners in dentistry that, in the preceding two years,
the practitioner has completed a prescribed course of continuing dental or dental hygiene education
established by the appropriate dental or dental hygiene association and approved by rule or
regulation of the director or by the board of examiners in dentistry. If the applicant submits
satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she has completed a prescribed course of continuing
dental education, dental hygiene, or DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assisting education
and has complied with the provisions of § 5-31.1-6, the board shall issue the applicant a license
registration for a two-year (2) period commencing on July 1. The board may extend for only one
six-month (6) period those educational requirements if the board is satisfied that the applicant has
suffered hardship that prevented meeting the educational requirement. No license to practice
dentistry or dental hygiene in this state shall be refused, nor any license suspended or revoked,
except as:
(1) Provided for in this chapter; and
(2) For failure to provide satisfactory evidence of continuing dental, dental hygiene, or
DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assisting education as provided for in this section.
(b) Licensees shall apply for recertification by submitting evidence of continuing dental,
dental hygiene, or DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assisting education on a biennial basis.
Application for biennial registration shall continue as provided in this section and § 5-31.1-21.
5-31.1-21. Biennial registration.
(a) Effective beginning in the calendar year 2006, on On or before the first day of May in
each even-numbered year, the board shall mail send an application for biennial registration to every
LC005256 - Page 3 of 13

person to whom a license to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, or DAANCE-certified maxillofacial
surgery assisting in this state has been granted by the constituted licensing authority in the state.
Every licensed person who intends to engage in the practice of his or her profession during the
ensuing two (2) years shall register his or her their license by filing with the board that application,
executed together with any registration form and fee that is established by regulation by the director,
on or before the first day of June in each even-numbered year. Upon receipt of that application and
fee, the board shall issue a registration certificate, effective by July 1 and expiring two (2) years
following June 30, and that registration certificate shall render its holder a registered practitioner
of dentistry or dental hygiene for that registration period.
(b) The registration certificate of all dentists, dental hygienists, or DAANCE-certified
maxillofacial surgery assistants whose renewals, accompanied by the prescribed fee, are not filed
on or before the first day of July automatically expire. The board may, in its discretion and upon
the payment by the dentist, dental hygienist, or DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assistant
of the current registration fee, plus an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54, reinstate any
certificate expired under the provisions of this section. All unexpended monies in the account of
the board of dentistry are transferred to the new board of dentistry as created by this chapter as of
June 2, 1988.
(c) Dentists, dental hygienists, and DAANCE-certified maxillofacial surgery assistants not
intending to practice in this state may request, on a biennial basis, to be placed on inactive status.
Those requests must be made, in writing, to the dental administrator and must be accompanied by
fees as set forth in § 23-1-54. Persons on inactive status may be reinstated by paying the current,
annual-registration fee and must meet any requirements established by this chapter and as are
further prescribed by the rules and regulations.
SECTION 5. Section 5-33.2-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-33.2 entitled "Funeral
Director/Embalmer and Funeral Service Establishments" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-33.2-15. Annual renewal of licenses.
All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter must be renewed annually by their
holders, who shall pay to the division a yearly renewal fee for the renewal of a funeral
director/embalmer’s license, and additional fees for each funeral-establishment branch office
license and for the crematory license. These fees are as set forth in § 23-1-54. On or before the
fifteenth day of November in each year, the division shall mail send to each licensed funeral
director/embalmer and to each licensed funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office,
and crematory an application for the renewal. Applications, accompanied by the fee for renewal,
shall be filed with the division on or before the thirty-first day of December in each year.
LC005256 - Page 4 of 13

Applications filed after the thirty-first of December and on or before the fifteenth of January must
be accompanied by a fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 for funeral director/embalmers and funeral
establishments in addition to the previously established renewal fees. Any funeral
director/embalmer who acts or holds himself or herself themselves out as a funeral
director/embalmer after his or her their certificate has been lapsed shall be punished as provided in
this chapter. Any funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory that acts
or holds itself out as a funeral establishment after its license has lapsed shall be punished as
provided in this chapter.
SECTION 6. Section 5-34-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-34 entitled "Nurses" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
5-34-19. Expiration and renewal of licenses.
(a) The license of every person licensed under this chapter shall expire on the first day of
March of every other year following the date of license. On or before the first day of January of
every year, the director shall mail an application send a reminder for renewal of license to persons
scheduled to be licensed that year. Every person who wishes to renew his or her their license shall
file with the department a duly executed renewal application together with the renewal fee as set
forth in § 23-1-54.
(b) Upon receipt of an application accompanied by payment of fees, the department shall
grant a renewal license effective March second and expiring two (2) years later on March first, and
that renewal license shall render the holder a legal practitioner of nursing for the period stated on
the certificate of renewal. Every person seeking renewal of a license pursuant to this section shall
provide satisfactory evidence to the department that in the preceding two (2) years the practitioner
has completed the ten (10) required continuing education hours as established by the department
through rules and regulations. The department may extend for only one six-month (6) period these
educational requirements if the department is satisfied that the applicant has suffered hardship that
prevented meeting the educational requirement.
(c) Any person practicing nursing during the time his or her their license has lapsed shall
be considered an illegal practitioner and is subject to the penalties provided for violation of this
chapter.
(d) A licensee whose license has expired by failure to renew may apply for reinstatement
according to the rules established by the board. Upon satisfaction of the requirements for
reinstatement, the board shall issue a renewal of license.
SECTION 7. Section 5-37-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-37 entitled "Board of
Medical Licensure and Discipline" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC005256 - Page 5 of 13

5-37-10. Biannual registration, physicians — Annual registration, hospitals.
(a) Effective beginning in calendar year 2004, on or before the first day of March in each
year, the board shall mail an application send a reminder for biannual registration to every person
to whom a license to practice medicine in this state has been granted by the licensing authority in
the state. Every licensed person who intends to engage in the practice of his or her their profession
during the ensuing two-year (2) period shall register his or her their license by submitting to the
board, on or before June 1, the application, executed together with the registration form, and fee as
established by regulation by the director of the department of health. Upon receipt of the application
and fee, the board shall issue a registration certificate effective July 1 and expiring two (2) years
following on June 30. The registration certificate renders the holder a registered practitioner of
medicine for that registration period. Effective beginning in calendar year 2004, any references in
this chapter to annual registration or annual limited registration shall be interpreted to mean
biannual registration and biannual limited registration, respectively.
(b) The registration certificate of all physicians whose renewals accompanied by the
prescribed fee are not completed and filed on or before the first day of July shall automatically
lapse. The board may, in its discretion and upon the payment by the physician of the current
registration fee plus an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54, reinstate any certificate lapsed under
the provisions of this section.
(c) Hospitals shall, on or before the first day of December of each year, submit an
application and annual fee to the board as a condition of rendering hospital services in the state.
The form of application and fee shall be as the director, by regulation, establishes; provided, that
the ratio of payment between hospital per-bed licensing fees and the combined licensing and board
of medical licensure and discipline fees paid by physicians remain the same as the ratio that existed
as of January 1, 1987. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited as general
revenues.
SECTION 8. Section 5-40-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-40 entitled "Physical
Therapists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-40-10. Continuing education requirements and expiration and renewal of licenses.
(a) The certificate of every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall expire
on the first day of May of the next even year following the date of original licensure. On or before
the first day of March of each year, the department shall mail an application send a reminder for
renewal of license to every person to whom a license has been issued or renewed during the current
licensure period. Every licensed person who desires to renew his or her their license shall provide
satisfactory evidence to the department that in the preceding two (2) years the practitioner has
LC005256 - Page 6 of 13

completed the twenty-four (24) required continuing education hours as established by the
department through rules and regulations and shall file with the department a renewal application
executed together with a renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 on or before the thirty-first day of
March of each even year. The department may extend for only one six-month (6) period these
educational requirements if the department is satisfied that the applicant has suffered hardship that
prevented meeting the educational requirement.
(b) Upon receipt of the renewal application, and payment of the renewal fee, the accuracy
of the application shall be verified and the department shall grant a renewal license effective the
second day of May, and expiring on the first day of May of the next even year.
(c) Any person who allows his or her their license to lapse by failing to renew it on or
before the thirty-first day of March of the next even year, as provided in this section, may be
reinstated by the department on payment of the current renewal fee plus an additional fee as set
forth in § 23-1-54.
(d) Any person using the title “physical therapist” or “physical therapist assistant” during
the time that his or her their license has lapsed is subject to the penalties provided for violations in
this chapter.
SECTION 9. Section 5-40.1-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-40.1 entitled
"Occupational Therapy" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-40.1-12. Renewal of licenses — Inactive status.
(a) Upon the recommendation of the board, the director shall issue to applicants who have
satisfactorily met the licensure requirements of this chapter, a license to practice occupational
therapy in this state. The license, unless sooner suspended or revoked, shall expire on the thirty-
first (31st) day of March, of each even year (biennially).
(1) On or before the first (1st) day of March of each even year, the administrator of the
division shall mail an application send a reminder for renewal of license to every individual to
whom a license has been issued or renewed during the current licensure period.
(2) Every licensed individual who desires to renew his or her their license shall file with
the division a renewal application executed together with the evidence of continuing education
requirements as delineated in subsection (a)(3) and the renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 made
payable by check to the general treasurer, state of Rhode Island, on or before the thirty-first (31st)
day of March of each even year.
(3) On application for renewal of license, occupational therapists and occupational therapy
assistants must show proof of participation in twenty (20) hours biennially in presentations, clinical
instruction, publications, research, in-service programs, American Occupational Therapy
LC005256 - Page 7 of 13

Association-recognized conferences, university courses, and/or self-study courses.
(4) Upon receipt of a renewal application and payment of fee, the director shall, upon the
recommendation of the board, grant a renewal license effective the thirty-first (31st) day of March
for a period of two (2) years, unless sooner suspended or revoked.
(5) Any individual who allows his or her their license to lapse by failing to renew it on or
before the thirty-first (31st) day of March of the next even year as provided in subsections (a)(1),
(a)(2), and (a)(3), may be reinstated by the director upon receiving a receipt from the division for
payment of the current renewal fee plus an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 made payable by
check to the general treasurer, state of Rhode Island.
(6) An individual using the title “occupational therapist” or “occupational therapy
assistant” during the time his or her their license has lapsed is subject to the penalties provided for
violation of those regulations and this chapter.
(b) An individual licensed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in
this state who does not intend to engage in the practice of occupational therapy within this state
during any year, may upon request to the division, have his or her their name transferred to an
inactive status and shall not be required to register biennially or pay any fee as long as he or she
they remains remain inactive. Any individual whose name has been transferred to an inactive status
pursuant to this section, may be restored to active status to practice occupational therapy without a
penalty fee, upon the filing of an application for licensure renewal, the licensure renewal fee as set
forth in § 23-1-54 made payable by check to the general treasurer of the state of Rhode Island, and
any other information that may be requested by the division.
SECTION 10. Section 5-44-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-44 entitled
"Psychologists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-44-15. Expiration and renewal of licenses — Continuing education — Lapsed
license.
(a) The license of every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall expire
on the first day of July of the next even-numbered year following the issuance of his or her their
license.
(b) On or before the first day of May of each even-numbered year, the department shall
mail an application send a reminder for renewal of license to every person to whom a license has
been issued or renewed during the cycle.
(c) Every licensed person who desires to renew his or her their license shall file with the
department a renewal application, executed, together with a renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54,
on or before the first day of June 30th in each even-numbered year. Upon receipt of a renewal
LC005256 - Page 8 of 13

application and payment of the renewal fee, the accuracy of the application shall be verified and
the department may grant a renewal license effective July 1st and expiring the June 30th in each
even-numbered year.
(d) Every licensed psychologist who desires to continue licensure as a licensed
psychologist shall present satisfactory evidence to the board and approved by rule or regulation of
the board that the licensed psychologist has completed a prescribed course of continuing licensed
psychological education.
(e) Any person who allows his or her their license to lapse, by failing to renew it on or
before June 1st 30th in each even-numbered year, as provided in this section, may be reinstated by
the department on payment of the current renewal fee, plus an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-
54. Any person using the title “psychologist” or offering services defined as the practice of
psychology under this chapter during the time his or her their license has lapsed is subject to the
penalties provided for violation of this chapter.
SECTION 11. Section 5-54-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-54 entitled "Physician
Assistants" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-54-11. Issuance and annual renewal of certificates of licensure.
(a) The board shall recommend to the director for registration those individuals who meet
the criteria for licensure as stated in this chapter. Upon that recommendation, the director shall
issue a certificate of licensure as a physician assistant.
(b) The certificate of licensure shall expire biannually on the thirtieth (30th) day of June.
On or before the first day of March in each year, the administrator shall mail an application send a
reminder for a renewal certificate to every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter, and
every person who desires his or her their certificate to be renewed shall file with the division the
renewal application together with a renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 on or before the first day
of June in every other year. Upon receipt of the renewal application and payment of fee, the
accuracy of the application shall be verified and the administrator shall grant a renewal certificate
effective July 1st and expiring June 30th two years hence, unless the certificate is sooner suspended
for cause as provided in § 5-54-12.
SECTION 12. Section 5-63.2-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-63.2 entitled "Mental
Health Counselors and Marriage and Family Therapists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-63.2-17. Expiration and renewal of license.
(a) Every clinical mental health counselor and marriage and family therapist who desires
to continue licensure as a licensed clinical mental health counselor and licensed marriage and
family therapist shall present satisfactory evidence to the board and approved by rule or regulation
LC005256 - Page 9 of 13

of the board that the licensed clinical mental health counselor and licensed marriage and family
therapist has completed a prescribed course of continuing education. The license of every person
licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall expire on the first day of July of the next even
year following the date of his or her license their; provided, that no license shall expire prior to July
1, 1998. On or before the first day of May in each even year, commencing in the year 1998, the
administrator shall mail an send a reminder application for renewal of license to every person to
whom a license is issued or renewed during the current year, and every licensed person who desires
to renew his or her their license shall file with the division the renewal application executed. This
application shall include verification of prescribed continuing education requirements, together
with a renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54, on or before the first day of June in each even year.
Upon receipt of the application and payment of the fee, the accuracy of the application shall be
verified and the administrator of professional regulation shall grant a renewal license effective July
1st and expiring twenty-four (24) months later.
(b) Any person who allows his or her their license to lapse, by failing to renew it on or
before June 1st 30th in each year, as provided in this section, shall be reinstated by the administrator
of professional regulation on payment of the current renewal fee plus an additional fee as set forth
in § 23-1-54; and verification of prescribed continuing education requirements. Any person using
the title “clinical mental health counselor” and/or “marriage and family therapist” during the time
his or her their license has lapsed shall be subject to the penalties provided for violation of this
chapter; provided, that if a person has allowed his or her their licensure to lapse for four (4) years
or more, he or she shall be reinstated at the discretion of the board.
SECTION 13. Section 5-86-13 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-86 entitled "Licensing of
Applied Behavior Analysts" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-86-13. Expiration and renewal of licenses — Continuing education — Lapsed
license.
(a) The license of every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall expire
on the first (1st) day of July of the next even-numbered year following the issuance of his or her
license.
(b) On or before the first day of May of each even-numbered year, the department shall
mail an application send notification of the for renewal of license to every person to whom a license
has been issued or renewed during the cycle.
(c) Every licensed person who desires to renew his or her their license shall file with the
department a renewal application, executed, together with a renewal fee of one hundred and fifty
dollars ($150), on or before the first (1st) thirtieth day of June in each even-numbered year. Upon
LC005256 - Page 10 of 13

receipt of a renewal application and payment of the renewal fee, the accuracy of the application
shall be verified and the department may grant a renewal license effective July 1st and expiring the
June 30th in each even-numbered year.
(d) Every licensed person who desires to continue licensure as a licensed applied behavior
analyst, licensed applied behavior assistant analyst, or psychologist with equivalent experience
shall present satisfactory evidence to the board and approved by rule or regulation of the board that
the licensed applied behavior analyst, licensed applied behavior assistant analyst, or psychologist
with equivalent experience, has completed a prescribed course of continuing applied behavior
analysis education.
(e) Any person who allows his or her their license to lapse, by failing to renew it on or
before June 1st in each even-numbered year, as provided in this section, may be reinstated by the
department on payment of the current renewal fee, plus an additional fee of forty dollars ($40.00).
Any person using the title licensed applied behavior analyst or licensed applied behavior assistant
analyst or psychologist with equivalent experience offering services defined as the practice of
behavior analysis under this chapter during the time his or her their license has lapsed is subject to
the penalties provided for violation of this chapter.
SECTION 14. Section 23-74-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-74 entitled "Unlicensed
Health Care Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-74-1. Definitions and applicability.
(a) As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) “Director” or “director of health” means the director of the department of health or the
director’s designee;
(2) “Unlicensed health care client” means an individual who receives services from an
unlicensed health care practitioner;
(3) “Unlicensed health care practices” means the broad domain of unlicensed healing
methods and treatments, including, but not limited to: (i) acupressure; (ii) Alexander technique;
(iii) aroma therapy; (iv) ayurveda; (v) cranial sacral therapy; (vi) crystal therapy; (vii) detoxification
practices and therapies; (viii) energetic healing; (ix) rolfing; (x) Gerson therapy and colostrum
therapy; (xi) therapeutic touch; (xii) herbology or herbalism; (xiii) polarity therapy; (xiv)
homeopathy; (xv) nondiagnostic iridology; (xvi) body work; (xvii) reiki; (xviii) mind-body healing
practices; and (ixx) naturopathy; and (xx) Qi Gong energy healing. “Unlicensed health care
practices” do not include surgery, x-ray radiation, prescribing, administering, or dispensing legend
drugs and controlled substances, practices that invade the human body by puncture of the skin,
setting fractures, any practice included in the practice of dentistry, the manipulation or adjustment
LC005256 - Page 11 of 13

of articulations of joints, or the spine, also known as chiropractic medicine as defined in chapter 30
of title 5, the healing art of acupuncture as defined in chapter 37.2 of title 5, or practices that are
permitted under § §§ 5-37-15 or § 5-34-31(6), 5-95-3(9) and (11) or any other new or existing
licensed scopes of practice within the department of health.
(4) “Unlicensed health care practitioner” means a person who:
(i) Is not licensed by a health-related licensing board or the director of health; or holds a
license issued by a health-related licensing board or the department of health in this state, but does
not hold oneself out to the public as being licensed or registered by the director or a health-related
licensing board when engaging in unlicensed health care;
(ii) Has not had a license issued by a health-related licensing board or the director of health
revoked or suspended without reinstatement unless the right to engage in unlicensed health care
practices has been established by order of the director of health;
(iii) Is engaging in unlicensed health care practices; and
(iv) Is providing unlicensed health care services for remuneration or is holding oneself out
to the public as a practitioner of unlicensed health care practices.
(b) This chapter does not apply to, control, prevent, or restrict the practice, service, or
activity of lawfully marketing or distributing food products, including dietary supplements as
defined in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act [see 21 U.S.C. § 321(ff)],
educating customers about those products, or explaining the uses of those products. Under Rhode
Island law, an unlicensed health care practitioner may not provide a medical diagnosis.
(c) A health care practitioner, licensed or registered by the director or a health-related
licensing board, who engages in unlicensed health care while practicing under the practitioner’s
license or registration, shall be regulated by and be under the jurisdiction of the applicable health-
related licensing board with regard to the unlicensed health care practices.
(d) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, persons in Rhode Island are authorized to
practice as unlicensed health care practitioners and receive remuneration for their services.
SECTION 15. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005256
========
LC005256 - Page 12 of 13